District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.13

Notification of decision and right to judicial review.

The Mayor’s agent shall transmit his or her written decision and any further written statement required by § 4-210.12 to the claimant. If the decision is adverse to the claimant, the Mayor’s agent shall notify him or her of his or her right to judicial review.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1013, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-210.13.